Hawaii statutes.
[§58-4] County protective regulations.
Each county shall enact appropriate protective regulations which designate
exceptional trees; provide for special county review prior to destruction of
exceptional trees, whether by removal or the existence of conditions which lead
to the destruction of such trees; provide for site plan review and amendment to
protect exceptional trees; and provide for injunctive relief against the
removal or destruction of exceptional trees. [L 1975, c 105, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next